Missouri, session 2026, HB3533.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 313.805, 313.820, and 313.835, RSMo, are repealed and four
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 313.805, 313.820, 313.823, and
313.835, to read as follows:
313.805. The commission shall have full jurisdiction over and shall supervise all
gambling operations governed by sections 313.800 to 313.850. The commission shall have
the following powers and shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement sections
313.800 to 313.850:
(1) To investigate applicants and determine the priority and eligibility of applicants
for a license and to select among competing applicants for a license the applicant which best
serves the interests of the citizens of Missouri;
(2) To license the operators of excursion gambling boats and operators of gambling
games within such boats, to identify occupations within the excursion gambling boat
operations which require licensing, and adopt standards for licensing the occupations
including establishing fees for the occupational licenses and to license suppliers;
(3) To adopt standards under which all excursion gambling boat operations shall be
held and standards for the facilities within which the gambling operations are to be held.
Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 311 to the contrary, the commission may authorize
the operation of gambling games on an excursion gambling boat which is also licensed to sell
or serve alcoholic beverages, wine, or beer. The commission shall regulate the wagering
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3533 2
structure for gambling excursions, provided that the commission shall not establish any
regulations or policies that limit the amount of wagers, losses, or buy-in amounts;
(4) To enter the premises of excursion gambling boats, facilities, or other places of
business of a licensee within this state to determine compliance with sections 313.800 to
313.850;
(5) To investigate alleged violations of sections 313.800 to 313.850 or the
commission rules, orders, or final decisions;
(6) To assess any appropriate administrative penalty against a licensee, including, but
not limited to, suspension, revocation, and penalties of an amount as determined by the
commission up to three times the highest daily amount of gross receipts derived from
wagering on the gambling games, whether unauthorized or authorized, conducted during the
previous twelve months as well as confiscation and forfeiture of all gambling game
equipment used in the conduct of unauthorized gambling games. Forfeitures pursuant to this
section shall be enforced as provided in sections 513.600 to 513.645;
(7) To require a licensee, an employee of a licensee or holder of an occupational
license to remove a person violating a provision of sections 313.800 to 313.850 or the
commission rules, orders, or final orders, or other person deemed to be undesirable from the
excursion gambling boat or adjacent facilities;
(8) To require the removal from the premises of a licensee, an employee of a licensee,
or a holder of an occupational license for a violation of sections 313.800 to 313.850 or a
commission rule or engaging in a fraudulent practice;
(9) To require all licensees to file all financial reports required by rules and
regulations of the commission;
(10) To issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and subpoenas duces tecum
for the production of books, records, and other pertinent documents, and to administer oaths
and affirmations to the witnesses, when, in the judgment of the commission, it is necessary to
enforce sections 313.800 to 313.850 or the commission rules;
(11) To keep accurate and complete records of its proceedings and to certify the
records as may be appropriate;
(12) To ensure that the gambling games are conducted fairly. No gambling device
shall be set to pay out less than eighty percent of all wagers;
(13) To require all licensees of gambling game operations to use a cashless wagering
system whereby all players' money is converted to physical or electronic tokens, electronic
cards, or chips which only can be used on the excursion gambling boat;
(14) To require excursion gambling boat licensees to develop a system, approved by
the commission, that allows patrons the option to prohibit the excursion gambling boat
licensee from using identifying information for marketing purposes. The provisions of this

HCS HB 3533 3
subdivision shall apply only to patrons giving identifying information for the first time. Such
system shall be submitted to the commission by October 1, 2000, and approved by the
commission by January 1, 2001. The excursion gambling boat licensee shall use identifying
information obtained from patrons who have elected to have marketing blocked under the
provisions of this section only for the purposes of enforcing the requirements contained in
sections 313.800 to 313.850. This section shall not prohibit the commission from accessing
identifying information for the purposes of enforcing section 313.004 and sections 313.800 to
313.850;
(15) To determine which of the authorized gambling games will be permitted on any
licensed excursion gambling boat;
(16) The commission shall base its decision to license excursion gambling boats on
any of the following criteria: the docking location or the excursion cruise could cause danger
to the boat's passengers, violate federal law or the law of another state, or cause disruption of
interstate commerce or possible interference with railway or barge transportation. The
commission shall consider economic feasibility or impact that would benefit land-based
development and permanent job creation. The commission shall not discriminate among
applicants for excursion gambling boats that are similarly situated with respect to the criteria
set forth in this section;
(17) The commission shall render a finding or findings concerning the transition from
a boat, barge, or floating facility to a nonfloating facility within thirty days after a hearing on
any request from an applicant or existing licensee. Such hearing may be held prior to any
final action on licensing to assist an applicant and any city or county in the finalizing of their
economic development plan;
(18) To require any applicant for a license or renewal of a license to operate an
excursion gambling boat to provide an affirmative action plan which has as its goal the use of
best efforts to achieve maximum employment of African-Americans and other minorities and
maximum participation in the procurement of contractual purchases of goods and services.
This provision shall be administered in accordance with all federal and state employment
laws, including Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended by the Civil Rights Act
of 1991. At license renewal, the licensee will report on the effectiveness of the plan. The
commission shall include the licensee's reported information in its annual report to the joint
committee on gaming and wagering;
(19) To annually adjust the admission fee imposed under section 313.820 for
inflation; and
(20) To take any other action as may be reasonable or appropriate to enforce sections
313.800 to 313.850 and the commission rules.

HCS HB 3533 4
313.820. 1. (1) An excursion boat licensee shall pay to the commission an admission
fee of [two] fivedollars and fifty cents, as adjusted for inflation under this subsection, for
each person [embarking on an excursion gambling boat with a ticket of admission.] present,
for every two hours the person is within the gambling area of each gambling facility.
The admission fee shall be distributed in the amounts as follows, as adjusted for
inflation under this subsection:
(a) Fifty cents of such admission fee shall be deposited to the credit of the
department of natural resources historic preservation revolving fund established under
sections 253.400 to 253.407:
a. Beginning on the effective date of this section and for each fiscal year
beginning on or after July 1, 2027, but ending on or before June 30, 2030, for the
purpose of commemorating the bicentennial of the location of the permanent seat of
government as described under Article XI, Section 2 of the Constitution of Missouri;
and
b. For all fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2030, for the purpose of
establishing a contract for the construction of a facility for the acquisition and
preservation of artifacts related to Missouri's riverboat heritage with a charitable
organization that is exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated
business taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143;
(b) Two dollars of such admission fee shall be deposited to the credit of the
veterans commission capital improvement trust fund established under section 42.300;
(c) One dollar of such admission fee shall be transmitted to the division of
developmental disabilities under the department of mental health for payments solely
for providing community services, ongoing learning, education, and support to people
with developmental disabilities including, but not limited to, the purchase of services
from providers designated by the division of developmental disabilities, but not for the
support of the facilities operated by the department of mental health;
(d) One dollar of such fee shall be deposited to the credit of the gaming commission
fund as authorized pursuant to section 313.835[, and];
(e) One dollar of such fee shall not be considered state funds and shall be paid to the
home dock city or county[.]; and
(f) Subject to appropriation, one cent of such fee deposited to the credit of the gaming
commission fund may be deposited to the credit of the compulsive gamblers fund created
pursuant to the provisions of section 313.842.
(2) (a) Within the first two months of each calendar year, the commission shall
adjust annually for inflation based on the CPI to determine the new admission fee

HCS HB 3533 5
beginning January first of each calendar year and shall go into effect at the beginning of
the new fiscal year. Such fee shall be calculated initially on the CPI for the remainder of
fiscal year 2027 and for the next ten complete fiscal years thereafter.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, the term "CPI" means the Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Midwest Region, as defined and officially
recorded by the United States Department of Labor or its successor.
(3) Nothing in this section shall preclude [any licensee from charging any amount
deemed necessary for a ticket of admission to any person embarking on an excursion
gambling boat. If tickets are issued which are good for more than one excursion, the
admission fee shall be paid to the commission for each person using the ticket on each
excursion that the ticket is used] the commission from adjusting the fee annually as
deemed necessary to account for inflation. If free passes or complimentary admission
tickets are issued, the excursion boat licensee shall pay to the commission the same fee upon
these passes or complimentary tickets as if they were sold at the regular and usual admission
rate; however, the excursion boat licensee may issue fee-free passes to actual and necessary
officials and employees of the licensee or other persons actually working on the excursion
gambling boat. The issuance of fee-free passes is subject to the rules of the commission, and
a list of all persons to whom the fee-free passes are issued shall be filed with the commission.
2. In all present and future forms of remote wagering, an excursion gambling
boat licensee shall pay to the commission a remote wagering access fee in lieu of an
admission fee of one and one-half percent of the total amount of moneys wagered each
month. The proceeds of such remote wagering access fee shall be deposited to the credit
of the gaming commission fund as authorized under section 313.835, and shall be
distributed in accordance with regulations promulgated by the commission, except that
the first thirty-five million dollars from the proceeds of the remote wagering access fee
shall be deposited to the credit of the department of natural resources historic
preservation revolving fund as described under subparagraph b of paragraph (a) of
subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section.
3. All licensees are subject to all income taxes, sales taxes, earnings taxes, use taxes,
property taxes or any other tax or fee now or hereafter lawfully levied by any political
subdivision; however, no other license tax, permit tax, occupation tax, excursion fee, or taxes
or fees shall be imposed, levied or assessed exclusively upon licensees by a political
subdivision. All state taxes not connected directly to gambling games shall be collected by
the department of revenue. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 32.057 to the contrary,
the department of revenue may furnish and the commission may receive tax information to
determine if applicants or licensees are complying with the tax laws of this state; however,

HCS HB 3533 6
any tax information acquired by the commission shall not become public record and shall be
used exclusively for commission business.
313.823. 1. In addition to the tax on adjusted gross receipts imposed under
section 313.822, there shall be an additional tax imposed on the adjusted gross receipts
received from gambling games authorized under sections 313.800 to 313.850 at the rate
of thirteen percent. The additional tax imposed under this subsection shall not be
subject to the provisions of subdivision (1) of section 313.822.
2. The taxes imposed under this section shall be returned to the commission in
accordance with the commission's rules and regulations, who shall transfer such taxes to
the director of revenue. All checks and drafts remitted for payment of these taxes shall
be made payable to the director of revenue.
313.835. 1. All revenue received by the commission from license fees, penalties,
administrative fees, reimbursement by any excursion gambling boat operators for services
provided by the commission and admission fees authorized pursuant to the provisions of
sections 313.800 to 313.850, except that portion of the admission fee, not to exceed one cent,
that may be appropriated to the compulsive gamblers fund as provided in section 313.820,
shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the "Gaming Commission Fund" which
is hereby created for the sole purpose of funding the administrative costs of the commission,
subject to appropriation. Moneys deposited into this fund shall not be considered proceeds of
gambling operations. Moneys deposited into the gaming commission fund shall be
considered state funds pursuant to Article IV, Section 15 of the Missouri Constitution. All
interest received on the gaming commission fund shall be credited to the gaming commission
fund. In each fiscal year, total revenues to the gaming commission fund for the preceding
fiscal year shall be compared to total expenditures and transfers from the gaming commission
fund for the preceding fiscal year.
2. The remaining net proceeds in the gaming commission fund shall be distributed in
the following manner:
(1) The first five hundred thousand dollars shall be appropriated on a per capita basis
to cities and counties that match the state portion and have demonstrated a need for funding
community neighborhood organization programs for the homeless and to deter gang-related
violence and crimes;
(2) The remaining net proceeds in the gaming commission fund for fiscal year 2013
and each fiscal year thereafter shall be distributed as follows:
(a) The first five million dollar portion shall be transferred to the access Missouri
financial assistance fund, established pursuant to the provisions of sections 173.1101 to
173.1107, and additional moneys as annually appropriated by the general assembly shall be
appropriated to such fund;

HCS HB 3533 7
(b) The second three million dollar portion shall be transferred to the veterans'
commission capital improvement trust fund created in section 42.300;
(c) The third four million dollar portion shall be transferred to the Missouri National
Guard trust fund created in section 41.214, and additional moneys as appropriated by the
general assembly may be appropriated to such fund, up to one million five hundred thousand
dollars annually;
(d) The fourth fifteen million dollar portion shall be transferred to the Missouri
department of natural resources historic preservation revolving fund established under
section 253.400 to 253.407 for the purposes of preserving and protecting collections of
historic artifacts;
[(d)] (e) Subject to appropriations, one hundred percent of remaining net proceeds in
the gaming commission fund, after the appropriations are made pursuant to the provisions of
paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subdivision, shall be transferred to the veterans'
commission capital improvement trust fund created in section 42.300.
✔